New Jersey, session 221, A3391.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Every State, county, county park, and municipal police department or law enforcement agency, and educational institution that appoints police officers pursuant to P.L.1970, c.211 (C.18A:6-4.2 et seq.), and every county sheriffs office and county correctional facility  shall adopt a maternity policy applicable to law enforcement officers who present proof of pregnancy. b.    For the purposes of this section, law enforcement officer means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, investigation, apprehension, arrest, and conviction of or detention of offenders against the laws of this State. 2.    The New Jersey Transit Police Department shall adopt a maternity policy that complies with the provisions of section 5 of P.L.    c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and is applicable to police officers who present proof of pregnancy. 3.    Every State correctional facility and juvenile facility operated by the Juvenile Justice Commission that employs adult or juvenile corrections officers or juvenile detention officers shall adopt a maternity policy applicable to officers who present proof of pregnancy. Any maternity policy adopted shall comply with the provisions of section 5 of P.L.    c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.    The State Parole Board shall adopt a maternity policy that complies with the provisions of section 5 of P.L.    c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and is applicable to parole officers who present proof of pregnancy. 5.    A maternity policy adopted pursuant to sections 1 through 4 of P.L.    c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall comply with applicable State and federal statutes, rules, and regulations and shall include, at minimum, the following: a.     Protection from discrimination due to pregnancy, childbirth, or any related medical conditions. b.    Procedures to ensure pregnant law enforcement officers, parole officers, and corrections officers receive treatment equal to other temporarily disabled officers. c.     Procedures to modify full-duty assignments and to provide temporary, light-duty assignments, if and when medically indicated, consistent with the operational requirements of the employer, and that take into consideration any specific restrictions identified by a pregnant officers physician. d.    Exemption from any mandatory firearms qualification requirements during the pregnancy and until the officer is certified for full-duty status. e.     Procedures to provide for any uniform and equipment modifications, as necessary and feasible. 6.    This act shall take effect on first day of the seventh month next following enactment.